Utah statutes.
17-50-306.   Granting franchises over public roads -- Limitation.

(1)  A county may grant franchises along and over the public roads and highways for all lawful purposes, upon such terms, conditions, and restrictions as in the judgment of the county legislative body are necessary and proper, to be exercised in such manner as to present the least possible obstruction and inconvenience to the traveling public.

(2)  A franchise under Subsection (1) may not be granted for a period longer than 50 years.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 133, 2000 General Session

